Washington statutes.
RCW 38.14.018

Pay of state guard members.

Members of the Washington state guard shall serve without pay except when on active state service with the state as defined in RCW 38.04.010, or when serving on inactive duty as defined in RCW 38.04.010 under orders of the governor specifically authorizing pay. When ordered to active state service or when serving on inactive duty in a pay status, members of the Washington state guard will be paid as prescribed for members of the national guard in RCW 38.24.050, except longevity adjustments for pay will be based solely on total service with the Washington state guard.

[ 1989 c 19 s 25.]